District of Columbia statutes.
10-501.04

Furnishing to buildings enumerated in section.

The Secretary of the Interior, through the National Park Service, is authorized to furnish steam from the Central Heating Plant to such buildings as may be erected by the District of Columbia on the property in the District of Columbia bounded by C Street, 3rd Street, Indiana Avenue, D Street, and John Marshall Place Northwest, and known as square 533; on the property bounded by C Street, John Marshall Place, Louisiana Avenue, and 6th Street Northwest, and known as square 490; on the property bounded by Pennsylvania Avenue, John Marshall Place, C Street, and 6th Street Northwest, and known as square 491; and on the property bounded by Pennsylvania Avenue, 3rd Street, C Street, and John Marshall Place Northwest, and known as reservation 10; provided, that the District of Columbia agrees to pay for the steam furnished at reasonable rates, not less than cost, as may be determined by the Secretary of the Interior; and provided further, that the District of Columbia agrees to provide all necessary connections with the government mains at its own expense, and in a manner satisfactory to the Secretary of the Interior.

June 21, 1939, 53 Stat. 852, ch. 236
1981 Ed., § 9-104.
1973 Ed., § 9-104.
National Academy of Sciences: Act of June 29, 1940, 54 Stat. 694, ch. 451, authorized the furnishing of steam from the Central Heating Plant to the National Academy of Sciences.